apertium-ewo.ewo.lexc
LEXICON Gender-3d ! cl5d one-class gender

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5d%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5d ;
!@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5d%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5d ;

LEXICON Gender-3e ! cl5 one-class gender (class 5)

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5 ;
!@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5 ;

LEXICON Gender-3f ! cl6a one-class gender

@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl6a%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl6a ;
!@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl6a%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl6a ;

LEXICON Gender-4 ! cl7-cl8 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl7%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl7 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl8%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl8 ;

LEXICON Gender-5 ! cl9-cl10 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl9%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl9 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl10%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl10 ;

LEXICON Gender-6 ! cl9-cl2 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl9%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl9 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl2%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl2 ;

LEXICON Gender-7 ! cl9-cl6 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl9%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl9 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl6%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl6 ;

LEXICON Gender-8 ! cl11-cl5 pairing
@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl11 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl5%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl5 ;

LEXICON Gender-10 ! cl11-cl16 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl11 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl16%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl16 ;



LEXICON V ! Lexicon for verb derivation and inflection

%<vblex%>: VERB_INF ;
%<vblex%>: VERB_REFL ;
%<vblex%>%<p1%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<p2%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<p3%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<f1%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<f2%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<f3%>: # ;

LEXICON VERB_REFL ! Lexicon for reflexive verbs

%<refl%>%<inf%>:ban # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF ! Lexicon for infinitive verbs

%<vblex%>%<inf%>:0 # ;

LEXICON POS ! Lexicon for possessive adjectives

@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@w%> StemsPosCl1 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@b%> StemsPosCl2 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@w%> StemsPosCl3 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@mi%> StemsPosCl4 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@d%> StemsPosCl5 ;
!@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@dz%> StemsPosCl5a ;
!@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@d%> StemsPosCl5b ;
!@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@l%> StemsPosCl5c ;
!@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@y%> StemsPosCl5d ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@m%{ë%}%> StemsPosCl6 ;
!@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@m%{ë%}%> StemsPosCl6a ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@e%> StemsPosCl7 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@bi%> StemsPosCl8 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@w%> StemsPosCl9 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@ StemsPosCl10 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@o%> StemsPosCl11 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@ StemsPosCl16 ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl1 !  Stems in Noun class 1 and Noun class 2 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.1@:@P.Class.1@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl2 ! Stems in Noun class 2 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.2@:@P.Class.2@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl3 ! Stems in Noun class 3 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.3@:@P.Class.3@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl4 ! Stems in Noun class 4 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.4@:@P.Class.4@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl5 ! Stems in Noun class 5 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.5@:@P.Class.5@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl6 ! Stems in Noun class 6 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.6@:@P.Class.6@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl7 ! Stems in Noun class 7 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.7@:@P.Class.7@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl8 ! Stems in Noun class 8 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.8@:@P.Class.8@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl9 ! Stems in Noun class 9 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.9@:@P.Class.9@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl10 ! Stems in Noun class 10 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.10@:@P.Class.10@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl11 ! Stems in Noun class 11 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.11@:@P.Class.11@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsPosCl16 ! Stems in Noun class 16 Possessive adjectives

@P.Class.16@:@P.Class.16@ Stems ;


LEXICON SuffPosCl1 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 1 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.1@:@R.Class.1@	# ; 

LEXICON SuffPosCl2 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 2 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.2@:@R.Class.2@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl3 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 3 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.3@:@R.Class.3@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl4 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 4 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.4@:@R.Class.4@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl5 !  Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 5 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.5@:@R.Class.5@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl6 !  Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 6 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.6@:@R.Class.6@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl7 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 7 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.7@:@R.Class.7@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl8 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 8 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.8@:@R.Class.8@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl9 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 9 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.9@:@R.Class.9@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl10 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 10 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.10@:@R.Class.10@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl11 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 11 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.11@:@R.Class.11@ # ;

LEXICON SuffPosCl16 ! Markers of possessive adjectives in noun class 16 should be moved before the stem

@R.Class.16@:@R.Class.16@ # ;


LEXICON GenderPos-1 ! cl1-cl2 pairing of possessive adjectives 

@R.Number.Sg@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl1%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffPosCl1 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl2%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffPosCl2 ;

LEXICON GenderPos-2 ! cl3-cl4 pairing of possessive adjectives

@R.Number.Sg@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffPosCl3 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl4%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffPosCl4 ;

LEXICON GenderPos-3 ! cl5-cl6 pairing of possessive adjectives

@R.Number.Sg@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffPosCl5 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl6%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffPosCl6 ;

LEXICON GenderPos-4 ! cl7-cl8 pairing of possessive adjectives 

@R.Number.Sg@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl7%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffPosCl7 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<adj%>%>pos%>%<cl8%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffPosCl8 ;

LEXICON GenderPos-5 ! cl9-cl10 pairing of possessive adjectives

@R.Number.Sg@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl9%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffPosCl9 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl10%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffPosCl10 ;

LEXICON GenderPos-6 ! cl11-cl16 pairing of possessive adjectives

@R.Number.Sg@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffPosCl11 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<adj%>%<pos%>%<cl16%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffPosCl16 ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                           STEMS                                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Stems
ama:ama GenderPos-1 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-1 ; ! "ma" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-2 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-2 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-3 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-3 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-4 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-4 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-5 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-5 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-6 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
ama:ama GenderPos-6 ; ! "mon" ; "my"
aǹ:aǹ Gender-7 ; ! "mer" ; "sea"
bag:bag Gender-3e ; ! "callouiteux" ; "stony"
baǹ:baǹ Gender-3e ; ! "cailloux" ; "stone" ## analysis not complete (one-class or two-class gender?)
baǹ:baǹ Gender-3e ; ! "cal" ; "callus" ## analysis not complete (one-class or two-class gender?)
baǹ:baǹ Gender-4 ; ! "fagot" ; "bundle"
bili:bili VERB_INF ; ! "être saoule" ; "get drunk"
bëgë:bëgë VERB_INF ; ! "porter" ; "carry"
bëlë:bëlë Gender-3e ; ! "capital" ; "capital" ## analysis not complete (one-class gender?)
bëbëla:bëbëla Gender-5 ; ! "vérité" ; "true"
bëm:bëm Gender-4 ; ! "laps de temps" ; "period of time"
bëme:bëme VERB_INF ; ! "prévenir" ; "prevent" ## analysis not complete (no final vowel -e?)
bilamvomba:bilamvomba Gender-5 ; !"désordre excessif" ; "lot of disorder"
bilëmbë:bilëmbë Gender-5 ; ! "microscope" ; "microscope"
bisi:bisi VERB_INF ; ! "photographier" ; "shoot"
bonga:bonga Gender-4 ; ! "câblage" ; "wiring"
bò:bò VERB_REFL ; ! "se faire" ; "happen"
bòd:bòd Gender-4 ; ! "cabine d'habillage" ; "changeroom"
bòdan:bòdan VERB_INF ; ! "pétrir" ; "knead"
bëbòlò:bëbòlò Gender-4 ; ! "bâton de manioc" ; "cassava sausage" ## analysis not complete (not analysable?)
bug:bug VERB_INF ; ! "casser" ; "broke"
bum:buma Gender-4 ; ! "cabosse" ; "pod"
bumulan:bumulan VERB_REFL ; ! "précipiter" ; "rush"
daǹ:daǹ VERB_INF ; ! "dépasser" ; ! "exceed"
dim:dim VERB_INF ; ! "éffacer" ; "erase"
dimiǹ:dimiǹ Gender-4 ; ! "cachotterie" ; "secret"
dudug:dudug Gender-4 ; ! "sueur" ; "sweat"
dulu:dulu Gender-5 ; ! "marche" ; "treck"
dzëm:dzëm VERB_INF ; ! "danser" ; "danse"
dzo:dzo Gender-4 ; ! "membre du corps" ; "body limb"
dzum:dzumi VERB_INF ; ! "donner aved dédain" ; "to give with disdain"
fëfè:fëfè Gender-4 ; ! "végétation anarchique" ; "wild growth"
fëg:fëg Gender-5 ; ! "sagesse" ; "wisdom"
fid:fid VERB_INF ; ! "écraser" ; "crush"
fulan:fulan Gender-4 ; ! "ressemblance" ; "similarity"
kad:kad VERB_INF ; ! "dire" ; "say"
Kal:kala VERB_REFL ; ! "se méfier" ; "distrust"
këǹ:këǹëbë VERB_INF ; ! "loucher des yeux" ; "squint with the eyes" ## analys not complete (a-këñ-ëb-ë)
fim:fim Gender-5 ; ! "puissance" ; "power"
kele:këlan VERB_REFL ; ! "se rompre" ; "break"
kídí:ki¹di¹ Gender-5 ; ! "matin" ; "morning"
kidi:kidi Gender-5 ; ! "matin" ; "morning"
kie:kie Gender-4 ; ! "fer" ; "iron"
kil:kil VERB_INF ; ! "refuser" ; "refuse"
kob:kob Gender-4 ; ! "peau" ; "skin"
kob:bob Gender-5 ; ! "puce" ; "flea"
kom:kom VERB_INF ; ! "fabriquer" ; "make"
kòn:kòn Gender-7 ; ! "maladie" ; "illness"!
kpëlëmve:kpëlëmve Gender-5 ; ! "cellulite" ; "stretch mark"
kuan:kuan VERB_INF ; ! "vendre" ; "sell"
kuli:kulan VERB_REFL ; ! "se détacher" ; "come off"
kwi:kwi VERB_INF ; ! "sortir" ; "go out"
labi:labi Gender-4 ; ! "cadeau" ; "gift"
lal:lali Gender-3e ; ! "captation" ; "capture, capturing" ## analysis not complete
laǹ:laǹandan Gender-3e ; ! "cafouillage" ; "mess, scramble"
las:las Gender-3e ; ! "cæcal" ; "caecal"
lèn:lèn VERB_INF ; ! "ruisseler" ; "stream"
lòbi:lòbi Gender-4 ; ! "marécage" ; "swamp"
lunga:lunga Gender-4 ; ! "association" ; "association"
mala:mala Gender-3e ; ! "calamité" ; "calamity"
mam:mama Gender-3e ; ! "caractéristique" ; "characteristics"
mvele:mvele Gender-3e ; ! "captivité" ; "captivity"
mvim:mvim Gender-5 ; ! "enflure" ; 
mvigi:mvigi Gender-5 ; ! "pratique médicale" ; "medical practice"
mvom:mvom Gender-3e ; ! "cajolerie" ; "cajolery"
myëgë:myëgë Gender-6 ; ! "digue" ; "dam"
ndalga:ndalga Gender-5 ; ! "membrane" ; ""
ndam:ndam Gender-5 ; ! "largeur" ; ""
ndi:ndi Gender-5 ; ! "espoir" ; "hope"
ndim:ndim Gender-3f ; ! "eau" ; "water"
ndòǹ:ndòǹ Gender-8 ; ! "rapport" ; "report"
ngan:ngan VERB_REFL ; ! "se braquer" ; "be stubbornly opposed to "
ngan:ngan Gender-4 ; ! "obstiné" ; "stubborn"
ngëngëmë:ngëngëmë Gender-5 ; ! "microbe" ; "germ"
ngoge:ngoge Gender-5 ; ! "soir" ; "evening"
ngondo:ngondo Gender-3e ; ! "horreur" ; "atrocity"
ngul:ngul Gender-5 ; ! "force" ; "strength"
nòǹòb:nòǹòban Gender-3e ; ! "capture" ; "capture"
nyiǹ:nyiǹ VERB_INF ; ! "vivre" ; "live"
nyuǹëlan:nyuǹëlan VERB_REFL ; ! "s'émietter" ; "crumbling"
op:op Gender-3d ; ! "ciel" ; "heaven"
salag:salag Gender-4 ; ! "caniveau" ; "gutter"
sanga:sanga Gender-10 ; ! "tisane" ; "herbal tea" 
sòbò:sòbò VERB_REFL ; ! "se cacher" ; "hide"
tin:tin Gender-5 ; ! "souche" ; "stump"
tò:tò Gender-4 ; ! "place" ; "seat"
vëga:vëga Gender-4 ; ! "exemple" ; "example"
vus:vus Gender-3e ; ! "camaraderie" ; "fellowship"
weme:weme VERB_REFL ; ! "se muer" ; "moult"
yè:yè VERB_INF ; ! "croître" ; "grow"
yoǹ:yoǹ Gender-3e ; ! "chaleur" ; "heat"
yòg:yòg Gender-4 ; !"courageux" ; "brave" 
zam:zam Gender-5 ; ! "lèpre" ; "leprosy"
